Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-1,102.01
Division of Weights and Measures; established.

There is hereby established a Division of Weights and Measures under the control of the department which shall be responsible for the enforcement of the Weights and Measures Act.

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 35.